NO.5 WILL NOT CRANK [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0103f1820300

5

WILL NOT CRANK

DESCRIPTION
•  Starter does not work.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Open starter circuit between the engine switch and starter
•  Starter malfunction
•  Seized/hydrolocked engine, flywheel
•  Immobilizer system (PATS) and/or circuit malfunction (if equipped)
•  Immobilizer system operating properly (engine key is not registered)
•  Advanced keyless entry system malfunction (if equipped)
•  Low or dead battery
•  Charging system malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Note
•  The following test should be performed on the advanced keyless entry system. If not equipped, go to the next step.
Start the engine using the mechanical engine switch.
Does the engine start?
Yes
Inspect advanced keyless entry system and repair or replace according to inspection result.
No
Go to the next step.
2
Note
•  The following test should be performed for vehicles with an immobilizer system. Go to Step 10 for vehicles without immobilizer system.
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Do the following conditions appear?
•  Engine is not completely started.
•  DTC P1260 is displayed.
Yes
Both conditions appear:
Go to Step 5.
No
Either or other condition appears:
Go to the next step.
3
Is the coil connector securely connected to the coil?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Connect the coil connector securely.
Return to Step 2.
4
Does the security light illuminate?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect instrument cluster and wiring harness.
5
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2 and retrieve the DTC.
DTC
B1213, B1342, B1600, B1601, B1602, B1681, B2103, B2431
Yes
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
No
Advanced keyless entry system is not equipped:
Go to the next step.
Advanced keyless entry system equipped:
Go to Step 8.
6
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
•  Between coil terminal A and instrument cluster terminal 2Q
•  Between coil terminal B and instrument cluster terminal 2S
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
Yes
Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
No
Go to the next step.
7
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
•  Between PCM 95 and instrument cluster terminal 1I
•  Between PCM terminal 87 and instrument cluster terminal 1K
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
Yes
Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
No
Go to Step 9.
8
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
Between keyless CM terminal 3Y and coil A
Between keyless CM terminal 3AA and coil B
Between keyless CM terminal 3W and PCM 87
Between keyless CM terminal 3X and PCM 95
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
Yes
Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
No
Go to the next step.
9
Is there continuity between PCM terminal 39 and the starter relay?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair replace the wiring harness.
10
Inspect the following:
•  Battery connection
•  Battery condition
•  Fuses
Are all items normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Service if necessary.
Repeat Step 10.
11
Is a clicking sound heard from starter when the engine switch is turned to the ON position?
Yes
Go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
12
Inspect starting system.
Is starting system normal?
Yes
Inspect for the seized/hydrolocked engine, flywheel.
No
Repair or replace components if necessary.
13
Do any other electrical accessories work?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect charging system.
14
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are any DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect the following:
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 119 or 120
•  Open circuit PCM control relay and PCM terminal 105
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 1, 2, 3, 114 or 117)
•  Poor connection to vehicle body ground
No
No DTC is displayed:
Inspect the following:
•  START circuit in engine switch
•  Open circuit between engine switch and starter
15
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms.
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect the related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, reprogram the PCM if later calibration is available. Retest.